Nebraska, session 109, LB468A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB468A LB468A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $5,000,000 from the
Securities Act Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $5,000,000 from the
Securities Act Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department of Banking and
Finance, for Program 66, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 468, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$5,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $5,000,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used
for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-